Washington statutes.
RCW 32.35.050

Approved articles to be filed and recorded—Organization complete.

In case of approval the director shall immediately give notice to the proposed incorporators and file one of the copies of the articles of incorporation in his or her own office, and shall transmit another copy to the secretary of state, and the last to the incorporators. Upon receipt from the proposed incorporators of the fees as are required for filing and recording other articles of incorporation, the secretary of state shall file and record the articles. Upon the filing of articles of incorporation approved by the director with the secretary of state, all persons named in the articles and their successors shall become and be a corporation, which shall have the powers and be subject to the duties and obligations prescribed by this title, and whose existence shall continue from the date of the filing of such articles until terminated pursuant to law; but such corporation shall not transact any business except as is necessarily preliminary to its organization until it has received a certificate of authority.

[ 1999 c 14 s 5.]